Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
COMMUNITY RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT SYSTEM

Cross References

Intermediate sanctions for selected offenders and defendants,
see §§353-10.5, 353-63.5, and 706-605.1.

§334-101 Establishment. It is the
intent of the legislature to establish a statewide system of residential
treatment programs which provide a range of available services which will be
alternatives to institutional care and are based on principles of residential,
community-based treatment.

It is further the intent of the legislature
that community residential mental health programs in the State of Hawaii be
developed in accordance with the guidelines and principles set forth in this
part. To this end, the department may implement the community residential
treatment system described in this part either with available allocations or
applying for funds from the legislature. Any private, nonprofit, or public
organization, or both, within the State is eligible to submit an application
for operation under this part.

It is further the intent of the legislature to
provide guidelines for such a system to the applicants, while allowing each
applicant the flexibility to design a system specific to the nature of the
community and the needs of the clients.

It is further the intent of the legislature
that the director, in authorizing programs which serve as alternatives to
institutionalization, follow the guidelines and principles developed herein. [L
1980, c 221, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 237, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next